Utah statutes.
32A-12-306 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Conflicting interests.
(1)  A member of the commission, the department director, or any employee of
the department may not be directly or indirectly interested or engaged in any
other business or undertaking dealing in alcoholic products, whether as owner,
part owner, partner, member of syndicate, shareholder, agent, or employee and
whether for the member's own benefit or in a fiduciary capacity for some other
person or entity.
(2)  A member of the commission, the department director, or any employee of
the department may not enter into or participate in any business transaction
as a partner, co-owner, joint venturer, or shareholder with any agent,
representative, employee, or officer of any supplier of alcoholic products to
the department.
(3)  The following are governed by Title 67, Chapter 16, Utah Public Officers'
and Employees' Ethics Act:
(a)  a member of the commission;
(b)  the department director; or
(c)  any employee of the department.
(4)  This section does not prevent the purchase of alcoholic products by any
commission member, the department director, or any employee of the department
as authorized by this title.
